Massachusetts, session 194th, H4099.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. No licensed real estate broker or other person or entity engaged in the rental
or leasing of residential real estate in the City of Northampton as agent of the landowner,
landlord, lessor, or sub-lessor shall demand, receive, or retain any payment, fee, commission or
other charge from a tenant or prospective tenant for any services on behalf of such landowner,
landlord, lessor, or sub-lessor for the listing, showing, qualifying of prospective tenants,
preparation and execution of documents, or otherwise arising out of the leasing of a residential
rental unit in such city.
SECTION 2. No landowner, landlord, lessor, or sub-lessor shall demand or require that a
tenant or prospective tenant retain, hire or engage a rental agent or broker and pay such agent or
broker a fee or commission as a condition to applying for or leasing a residential rental unit in
of 2

the City of Northampton, and no such landowner, lessor, or sub-lessor shall demand or require
that a tenant or prospective tenant make any payment in violation of SECTION 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. Violation of this act shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice in
the conduct of a trade or commerce in violation of section 2 (a) of chapter 93A.
SECTION 4. The City of Northampton may, by ordinance, establish a fine or penalty for
violation of this act, not to exceed $1,000.00 per violation.
This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 2